Tennessee statutes. Title 37 Juveniles
Part 2

Youth Development Centers

37-5-201. Establishment — Coeducational programs.

For the detention, treatment, rehabilitation and education of children found to be delinquent, there shall be youth development centers. Such centers shall be under the supervision and control of the commissioner of children's services.

Nothing in this chapter shall be construed so as to restrict or prohibit coeducational programs in any youth center for delinquent children.

The youth development center located in Fayette County is hereby renamed “The John S. Wilder Youth Development Center.”

Acts 1955, ch. 127, § 1; modified; 1974, ch. 595, § 1; 1975, ch. 160, § 1; T.C.A., § 41-827; Acts 1989; ch. 278, § 57; T.C.A., §41-5-105; Acts 1996, ch. 1079, § 137.

Cross-References. Accounting for funds, §§4-6-116 —4-6-127.

Appropriations, §§4-6-128 —4-6-134.

Architects and engineers, §§4-6-114,4-6-115.

Discipline in special school district of penal and reformatory institutions, title 49, ch. 6, part 44.

Library region for penal and reformatory in stitutions, §4-6-144.

Management by department of correction, §4-6-102.

Medical and dental care, §§4-6-109 —4-6-113.

Special school district, §4-6-143.

Law Reviews.

Problem of Age and Jurisdiction in the Juvenile Court (C. William Reiney), 19 Vand. L. Rev. 833 (1966).

37-5-202. Superintendents.

There shall be a superintendent of each youth center to be appointed by the commissioner of children's services.

Acts 1955, ch. 127, § 2; impl. am. Acts 1955, ch. 102, § 1; T.C.A., § 41-828; Acts 1989, ch. 278, §§ 54, 56, 58; T.C.A., §41-5-106; Acts 1996, ch. 1079, § 137.

Cross-References. Counselors of correctional institutions, qualifications, §8-50-105.

Department of correction superintendent, §§4-6-103,4-6-104.

37-5-203. Powers and duties of superintendent.

The superintendent has charge, control and supervision of the youth center, its employees and students.

Such superintendent has authority to make recommendations to the commissioner of children's services for the release of children placed in the center.

Acts 1955, ch. 127, § 3; 1963, ch. 264, § 3; 1977, ch. 387, § 2; T.C.A., § 41-829; Acts 1989, ch. 278, § 59; T.C.A., §41-5-107; Acts 1996, ch. 1079, § 137.

Law Reviews.

Criminal Law and Procedure — 1963 Tennessee Survey (Robert E. Kendrick), 17 Vand. L. Rev. 977 (1963).

37-5-204. Education — Character development — Work programs.

The superintendents of such centers shall have the authority, subject to the approval of the commissioner of children's services, to introduce any branch of educational pursuit that they may deem to be in the best interest of the children, and they shall use their utmost efforts for the moral, physical and mental development of the children, so that they may be molded into good men and women and useful citizens.

Any superintendent may, subject to the approval of the commissioner, establish a work opportunity program for children sixteen (16) years of age or older.

The superintendent shall, before any child is permitted to take employment, ensure that the prospective employment meets all requirements of the department of labor and workforce development pertaining to the employment of children.

The superintendent will ascertain the availability of transportation to and from the place of work and the cooperation of the employer or supervisors with supervision requirements. Hours of release for involvement of the work opportunity program will be the responsibility of the superintendent in keeping with departmental consideration for the good of the child and the welfare of the department.

All moneys earned by the child in the work opportunity program shall be posted to the child's trust fund account. Expenditures under this program from the child's earnings should be limited to transportation, special clothing, tools or lunch and other casual expenses with the approval of the superintendent.

Acts 1955, ch. 127, § 4; impl. am. Acts 1955, ch. 102, § 1; 1973, ch. 18, § 1; T.C.A., § 41-830; Acts 1989, ch. 278, §§ 54, 60; T.C.A., §41-5-108; Acts 1996, ch. 1079, § 137; 1999, ch. 520, § 37.

Cross-References. Counselors at educational and correctional institutions, qualifications, §8-50-105.

Library region for penal and reformatory institutions, §4-6-144.

Special school district of penal and reformatory institutions, §4-6-143.

37-5-205. Transfer and commitment of children.

Fees that are allowed by law for carrying prisoners to the penitentiary shall be allowed to the sheriffs for taking children found to have committed offenses punishable in the penitentiary to such youth centers.

The state shall only be responsible for the transfer of such children as have been found to have committed offenses punishable by imprisonment in the penitentiary. The expense of transporting delinquent children not found to have committed offenses punishable in the penitentiary shall be paid by the counties from which committed.

When any female child is to be transported to such youth centers, the sheriff shall deputize a suitable woman of good moral character to convey such child. In the event the sheriff shall not find such a woman in the county, the department shall provide a proper and suitable escort for the child, and this escort shall be paid from the allowance provided for the sheriff. The expense of the woman so deputized shall be paid from the allowance for the sheriff.

Acts 1955, ch. 127, § 5; impl. am. 1955, ch. 102, § 1; T.C.A., § 41-831; Acts 1989, ch. 278, § 61; T.C.A., §41-5-109; Acts 1996, ch. 1079, §§ 133, 137.

Compiler's Notes. This section may be affected by §9-1-116, concerning entitlement to funds, absent appropriation.

Law Reviews.

Problem of Age and Jurisdiction in the Juvenile Court (C. William Reiney), 19 Vand. L. Rev. 833 (1966).

37-5-206. Retention of children committed for penitentiary offenses — Transfer to penitentiary — Prosecution for escape.

Any child committed to the department for an offense punishable by confinement in the penitentiary may be retained in a youth center until such child's nineteenth birthday, or at any time after the child's eighteenth birthday, when found to be incorrigible by the superintendent, subject to agreement between the commissioner of correction and the commissioner of children's services, may be transferred to the penitentiary. The authority for transferring such children eighteen (18) years of age or older shall be upon warrant issued by the commissioner, such warrant to contain the name of the child, age at conviction and at the transfer, and the offense for which committed. The superintendent shall furnish to the warden of the penitentiary the original commitment papers in the case.

Any child or inmate sixteen (16) years of age or over, confined in a youth center and who escapes therefrom commits a Class A misdemeanor. The superintendent of the youth center, with the approval of the commissioner, may certify to the district attorney general in the district in which the escape was effected, that such escape has occurred and the facts relating thereto. The child or inmate thus certified as having escaped may be prosecuted as an adult in the court having jurisdiction of the offense, as if the child or inmate were an adult.

Acts 1955, ch. 127, § 6; impl. am. Acts 1955, ch. 102, § 1; 1963, ch. 264, § 4; impl. am. Acts 1981, ch. 120; T.C.A., § 41-832; Acts 1989, ch. 278, § 62; T.C.A., §41-5-110; Acts 1996, ch. 1079, § 137.

Code Commission Notes.

The misdemeanor in (b) has been designated a Class A misdemeanor by authority of §40-35-110, which provides that an offense designated a misdemeanor without specification as to class is a Class A misdemeanor. See also §39-11-114.

Cross-References. Disposition of delinquent child, §37-1-131.

Penalty for Class A misdemeanor, §40-35-111.

Place of detention, escape from detention, §37-1-116.

Transfer from juvenile court, §37-1-134.

Textbooks. Tennessee Criminal Practice and Procedure (Raybin), § 8.6.

37-5-207. Commitment for federal offense.

Authority is given to the department for commitment of children who may be convicted of any offense against the United States in any district court of the United States within the state and sentenced by such court to the department, and to that end, the commissioner may enter into a contract with the attorney general of the United States for their detention, subsistence and proper employment of such juvenile offenders and the rate of compensation to be paid for the use of the institution by the United States.

Acts 1955, ch. 127, § 7; impl. am. Acts 1955, ch. 102, § 1; T.C.A., § 41-833; Acts 1989, ch. 278, § 63; T.C.A., §41-5-111; Acts 1996, ch. 1079, § 137.

37-5-208. Procedure for commitment — Form.

A judge committing a child under eighteen (18) years of age to the department shall make out and sign a commitment on a form provided by the department and certified to by the clerk under the seal of the court.

Such commitment form, together with information of a social nature, shall be forwarded with the child.

Acts 1955, ch. 127, § 9; impl. am. Acts 1955, ch. 102, § 1; T.C.A., § 41-835; Acts 1989, ch. 278, § 65; T.C.A., §41-5-113; Acts 1996, ch. 1079, § 137.

Cross-References. Commitment by juvenile court, §37-1-117.

37-5-209. Records and accounts — Sale of unneeded property — Reports.

The superintendents shall:

Keep complete records of all children, their conduct, character and aptitudes;

Keep a set of account books in which all expenses of the youth center shall be entered, and shall sign all vouchers;

Keep a record of all products made or raised on the grounds of the youth center; and

Sell such products as are not used or needed by the youth center, and make reports of such sales to the commissioner of children's services.

Their books and accounts shall at all times be open to the inspection of any state auditor.

They shall give bond payable to the state, for the safekeeping of all money or property belonging to the state coming into their possession.

They shall make quarterly reports to the commissioner of the income and expenditures of their youth centers, the number of children, their terms, names, ages and conduct.

Acts 1955, ch. 127, § 10; impl. am. Acts 1955, ch. 102, § 1; T.C.A., § 41-836; Acts 1989, ch. 278, § 66; T.C.A., §41-5-114; Acts 1996, ch. 1079, § 137.

Cross-References. Accounting for funds, §§4-6-116 —4-6-127.

Records of inmates, §4-6-140.

37-5-210. Buildings and equipment.

The commissioner shall be authorized, subject to the approval of the governor, to erect all buildings necessary for the proper maintenance of the children committed to the department of children's services, and to purchase all things for the proper equipment of the youth centers, under appropriations made from time to time.

Acts 1955, ch. 127, § 12; T.C.A., § 41-838; Acts 1989, ch. 278, § 68; T.C.A., §41-5-116; Acts 1996, ch. 1079, § 137.

Compiler's Notes. This section may be affected by §9-1-116, concerning entitlement to funds, absent appropriation.

Cross-References. Appropriations, §§4-6-128 —4-6-134.

Architects and engineers, §§4-6-114,4-6-115.

37-5-211. Products of youth centers — Expenditure of receipts.

The commissioner shall keep an account of all products of the youth centers, and shall include a report of same in the commissioner's biennial report.

All money received from the operation of the youth centers shall be expended for the proper maintenance of the youth centers.

Acts 1955, ch. 127, § 13; T.C.A., § 41-839; Acts 1989, ch. 278, § 69; T.C.A., §41-5-117; Acts 1996, ch. 1079, § 137.

37-5-212. Instruction in art of barbering.

The commissioner is hereby authorized to institute within the youth development centers a course of instruction in the art of barbering as encompassed within the provisions of title 62, chapter 3.

Acts 1961, ch. 66, § 1; T.C.A., § 41-849; Acts 1989, ch. 278, §§ 54, 71; T.C.A., §41-5-124; Acts 1996, ch. 1079, § 137.

37-5-213. Authorized courses of instruction.

The commissioner is authorized to institute within the youth development centers courses of instruction for:

GED(R) preparation; and

Vocational and occupational training.

Acts 2007, ch. 195, § 1.